Wisconsin, session 2025, SB21.
do enact as follows:SB21,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes is amended to read:SB21,2,7271.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 3(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5i), (5j), (5k), 4(5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 5liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 6partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under s. 71.21 (4) or 771.34 (1k) (g).SB21,21Section 2. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:SB21,3,6271.05 (6) (b) 57. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, to 3the extent otherwise included in Wisconsin taxable income if not for this 4subdivision, the amount of the capital gain as computed under the Internal 5Revenue Code from the transfer of ownership of a business in this state to an 6employee stock ownership plan or a worker-owned cooperative.SB21,3,97b. No modification may be claimed under this subdivision unless an employee 8stock ownership plan or worker-owned cooperative owns more than 50 percent of the 9business whose transfer results in a capital gain described in subd. 57. a.SB21,3,1110c. In this subdivision, “employee stock ownership plan” has the meaning given 11in 26 USC 4975 (e) (7).SB21,3,1312d. In this subdivision, “worker-owned cooperative” has the meaning given for 13“eligible worker-owned cooperative” in 26 USC 1042 (c) (2).SB21,314Section 3. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB21,3,161571.07 (12) Employee ownership conversion costs credit. (a) Definitions. 16In this subsection:SB21,3,19171. “Claimant” means a person that owns an interest in a qualified business 18prior to its conversion to an employee stock ownership plan or worker-owned 19cooperative and that files a claim under this subsection.SB21,3,20202. “Conversion costs” has the meaning given in s. 73.03 (79) (b) 1.SB21,3,22213. “Employee stock ownership plan” has the meaning given in 26 USC 4975 (e) 22(7).SB21,3,23234. “Qualified business” has the meaning given in s. 73.03 (79) (b) 3.SB21,4,215. “Worker-owned cooperative” has the meaning given for “eligible worker-2owned cooperative” in 26 USC 1042 (c) (2).SB21,4,73(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and 4subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 5credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 for the taxable year during which a 6conversion to an employee stock ownership plan or a worker-owned cooperative is 7complete, up to the amount of those taxes, all of the following:SB21,4,981. An amount equal to 70 percent of the conversion costs, up to $100,000, 9incurred by a qualified business for converting to a worker-owned cooperative.SB21,4,12102. An amount equal to 50 percent of the conversion costs, up to $100,000, 11incurred by a qualified business for converting to an employee stock ownership 12plan.SB21,4,1713(c) Limitations. 1. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless the 14claimant files an application with the department, at the time and in the manner 15prescribed by the department, and the department approves the application. The 16claimant shall submit a copy of the certification under s. 73.03 (79) (a) 3. with the 17claimant’s return.SB21,5,2182. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations may 19not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for and the amount of 20the credit are based on the amounts paid by the entities under par. (b). A 21partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the 22amount of the credit that each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim 1and shall provide that information to each of them. Partners, members, and 2shareholders may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interests.SB21,5,43(d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 4s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB21,45Section 4. 71.10 (4) (em) of the statutes is created to read:SB21,5,6671.10 (4) (em) Employee ownership conversion costs credit under s. 71.07 (12).SB21,57Section 5. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB21,5,11871.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 971.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 10(5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and passed through to 11partners shall be added to the partnership’s income.SB21,612Section 6. 71.26 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB21,5,181371.26 (2) (a) 4. Plus the amount of the credit computed under s. 71.28 (1dm), 14(1dx), (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), 15(5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 16liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 17partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under 18s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).SB21,719Section 7. 71.26 (2) (a) 13. of the statutes is created to read:SB21,5,232071.26 (2) (a) 13. a. Minus the amount of the capital gain as computed under 21the Internal Revenue Code, to the extent included in federal taxable income, from 22the transfer of ownership of a business in this state to an employee stock ownership 23plan or a worker-owned cooperative.SB21,6,31b. The deduction under this subdivision does not apply unless an employee 2stock ownership plan or worker-owned cooperative owns more than 50 percent of the 3business whose transfer results in a capital gain described in subd. 13. a.SB21,6,54c. In this subdivision, “employee stock ownership plan” has the meaning given 5in 26 USC 4975 (e) (7).SB21,6,76d. In this subdivision, “worker-owned cooperative” has the meaning given for 7“eligible worker-owned cooperative” in 26 USC 1042 (c) (2).SB21,88Section 8. 71.28 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB21,6,10971.28 (12) Employee ownership conversion costs credit. (a) Definitions. 10In this subsection:SB21,6,13111. “Claimant” means a person that owns an interest in a qualified business 12prior to its conversion to an employee stock ownership plan or worker-owned 13cooperative and that files a claim under this subsection.SB21,6,14142. “Conversion costs” has the meaning given in s. 73.03 (79) (b) 1.SB21,6,16153. “Employee stock ownership plan” has the meaning given in 26 USC 4975 (e) 16(7).SB21,6,17174. “Qualified business” has the meaning given in s. 73.03 (79) (b) 3. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb21 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb21 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB21 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB21 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB21: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting